Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1504
Agreement; dispute; hearing.

In the event of any disagreement arising among the parties to an agreement authorized by sections 70-1501 to 70-1505 which cannot be settled by negotiations, the dispute may be submitted to the Nebraska Power Review Board. Upon the submission of any such disagreement to the board, the board shall set a time and place for hearing thereon and give notice as provided in section 70-1013. Following such hearing, the board shall make its recommendations for the settlement of such disagreement, which recommendations shall be advisory only.

Laws 1984, LB 805, § 4.